Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.86.230.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“psychological associate” means a person licensed under this chapter who renders psychological services and complies with AS

08.86.164

;

“psychologist” means a person who practices psychology;

“to practice psychology” means to render or offer to render for a fee to individuals, groups, organizations, or the public for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or amelioration of psychological problems and emotional and mental disorders of individuals or groups or for conducting research on human behavior, a psychological service involving the application of psychological principles, methods, and procedures of understanding, predicting, and influencing behavior, including

the principles pertaining to learning, perception, motivation, emotions, and interpersonal relationships;

the methods and procedures of interviewing, counseling, psychotherapy, biofeedback, behavior modification, and hypnosis;

constructing, administering and interpreting tests of mental abilities, aptitudes, interests, attitudes, personality characteristics, emotions, and motivations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am §§ 12, 13 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 55 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 18 — 20, 22, 24 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 29 SLA 1983; am § 9 ch 63 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 51 SLA 1996; am § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 and 2019 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, repealed former (3), defining “private agency”.